Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 13 UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANKS
12-13-11. Corrective action for release of petroleum product into environment.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that there is or has been a release of a petroleum product into the environment from an underground tank, regardless of the time at which storage of such material occurred, and has reason to believe that such release poses a danger to health or the environment, the director shall obtain corrective action for such release from any current owner or operator or from any past owner or operator who has contributed to such release, either individually or jointly. Such corrective action shall be performed in accordance with a plan approved by the director.

If the tank owner or operator is unable, as determined by the director, to perform corrective action as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the director may undertake preventive or corrective actions utilizing funds from the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund.

(b.1)
The owner or operator of an underground storage tank shall be liable for all costs of preventive, corrective, and enforcement actions incurred by the State of Georgia as a result of a release or a substantial threat of release of a petroleum product from an underground storage tank unless the owner or operator, or both, are participants in the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund and enter into a consent agreement with the state.
In such consent agreement, at a minimum, the owner or operator, or both, must agree that:

Whenever costs have been incurred by the director pursuant to this subsection for taking corrective or enforcement action, the owner or operator shall be liable for the first $10,000.00 per occurrence for corrective action, such funds to be paid into the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund within 90 days of notice by the director;

The State of Georgia and the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund are relieved of all liability for loss of business, damages, and taking of property associated with the corrective action;

The division or its contractors may enter upon the property of the owner or operator or the real property where the underground storage tank of the owner or operator is located if the real property owner and the underground storage tank owner or operator are not the same person, at such time and in such manner as deemed necessary to effectuate corrective action to protect health and the environment, such right-of-entry by the division or its contractors being implied by the willingness of the real property owner to allow the underground storage tank of the owner or operator to be placed on the real property of the real property owner;

The owner or operator shall be fully responsible for replacement or retrofitting or both of leaking tanks and associated piping or shall allow division contractors to refill excavated areas resulting from removal of leaking tanks and associated piping with clean earth to its original elevation;

The liability of the state and the state Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund shall not exceed $1 million per occurrence; and

Such other provisions as are deemed appropriate by the board to ensure adequate protection of health and the environment.

To encourage voluntary corrective action, an owner or operator conducting corrective action under this chapter and participating in the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund, either through the owner's or operator's own personnel or through response action contractors or subcontractors, is entitled, as evidenced by an executed corrective action agreement with the division, to reimbursement of reasonable cost from the trust fund, subject to the following provisions:

Prior to initiating such corrective action, the owner or operator must submit to and receive approval from the division of the proposed corrective action plan, together with projected costs of the corrective action, and once approved the owner or operator shall not substantially deviate from the approved costs and corrective actions without the prior approval of the division;

The owner or operator or the owner's or operator's agents shall keep and preserve suitable records demonstrating compliance with the approved corrective action plan and all invoices and financial records associated with costs for which reimbursement will be requested;

Upon receipt of a complete corrective action plan, the director shall make a determination and provide written notice as to whether the owner or operator responsible for corrective action is eligible or ineligible for reimbursement of costs. Should the director determine the owner or operator is ineligible, he or she shall include in his or her written notice an explanation setting forth in detail the reasons for the determination;

The owner or operator shall submit to the director a written notice that corrective action has been completed within 30 days of completing corrective action;

No later than 30 days from the submission of the notice as required by paragraph (4) of this subsection, the owner or operator must submit an application for reimbursement of costs in accordance with criteria established by the director. The application for reimbursement must include the total amount of the corrective action and the amount of reimbursement sought;

The first $10,000.00 of eligible costs incurred by the owner or operator are not eligible for reimbursement from the trust fund nor are costs for replacement or retrofitting of leaking tanks and associated piping; and

No costs may be reimbursed to the owner or operator until such time as corrective action has been completed in accordance with the plan approved by the division; provided, however, that interim payments may be made if the corrective action is being conducted in accordance with a plan approved by the division which allows interim payments.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b), (b.1), and (c) of this Code section, should the division find that any of the following situations exist, the owner or operator, or both, shall be liable for 100 percent of costs associated with preventive, corrective, or enforcement actions necessary to protect health or the environment:

The release was due to willful or negligent actions by the owner or operator;

The owner or operator is in arrears for moneys owed to the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund;

The owner or operator moves in any way to obstruct the efforts of the division or its contractors to effectuate corrective action; or

The owner or operator of a petroleum product underground tank has stored a petroleum product, after July 1, 1988, in such tank which has not been subjected to the environmental assurance fee imposed in subsection (a) of Code Section 12-13-10 and the late participation fee provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 12-13-10.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b), (b.1), and (c) of this Code section, should the division find, based upon rules promulgated by the board, that any of the following situations exist, the owner or operator, or both, may be liable for up to 100 percent of costs associated with preventive, corrective, or enforcement actions necessary to protect health or the environment:

The release is from a tank not registered in accordance with Code Section 12-13-13;

The owner or operator fails to comply with any provision of the agreement required by subsection (b.1) or (c) of this Code section; or

The owner or operator has failed to comply with any provisions of this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter.

If no underground storage tank owner or operator can be found, the director may undertake preventive or corrective actions utilizing funds from the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund or any appropriate federal funds as provided by the federal act, and any real property owner by virtue of the fact that he or she has allowed these underground storage tanks to exist or be placed on his or her real property shall be deemed to have granted permission to the division or its contractors or agents to enter its real property to investigate and take samples and, when deemed necessary by the director, to effectuate the necessary corrective action to protect health and the environment.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 256, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-12. Recovery in event of discharge or threat of discharge of regulated substance; lien.

Except as otherwise provided for in subsections (b), (b.1), and (c) of Code Section 12-13-11, in the event of any discharge or threatened discharge of a regulated substance, the state or any of its agencies may recover in a civil action from any owner, operator, or other responsible person all costs incurred by the state or any of its agencies or moneys from the federal Leaking Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund in the assessment and the cleanup of any release of a regulated substance and all costs incurred in the prevention, abatement, or removal of any threatened discharge of a regulated substance, including reasonable attorney's fees and any other necessary costs of response incurred by the state or any of its agencies. All moneys recovered for costs incurred under the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund shall be deposited into the principal of the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund. The state shall have a lien on the real property on which the underground storage tanks which caused the discharge are located, even if owned by a person other than the owner or operator, provided the owner or operator is in privity with the real property owner.

The lien provided for above shall be perfected by filing a certified copy of any judgment obtained against the owner or operator with the clerk of superior court for entry on the general execution docket in the county in which any real property of the owner or operator is located or where the real property on which the leaking underground storage tanks were operated is located.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "clerk of superior court" was substituted for "Clerk of Superior Court" in subsection (b).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-13. Notification by owner of underground storage tank.

Unless such notification has been previously provided to the division or to the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with the federal act, any person who owns an underground storage tank shall notify the division, on forms provided by the division, within a reasonable number of days which the director shall specify, indicating the age, size, type, location, and uses of such tanks, identifying the regulated substances stored, and providing any other information which may be deemed relevant under such conditions as the director may prescribe.

Unless such notification has been previously provided to the division or to the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with the federal act, any person who owns an underground storage tank taken out of service after January 1, 1974, shall notify the division in writing, on forms provided by the division, within a reasonable number of days which the director shall specify, indicating the date the tank was taken out of operation, the age of the tank at the date taken out of operation, the size, type, and location of the tank, and the type and quantity of substances left stored in such tank on the date taken out of operation and shall provide any other information which may be deemed relevant under such conditions as the director may prescribe.

Any owner who brings into use an underground storage tank after July 1, 1988, shall notify the division, on forms provided by the division, within 30 days of the existence of such tank, specifying the age, size, type, location, and uses of such tank.

Beginning 30 days after the board issues new tank performance standard rules and regulations pursuant to Code Section 12-13-5, any person who sells a tank intended to be used as an underground storage tank shall notify the purchaser of such tank of the owner's notification requirements pursuant to this Code section.

The owner or operator of an underground storage tank in use or capable of being used shall provide to the division an annual underground storage tank notification for all underground storage tanks for which an initial notification has previously been given or should have been given pursuant to this Code section. Such notification shall be provided on forms as prescribed by the division and shall be submitted in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board. It shall be a violation of this Code section for an owner or operator of an underground storage tank to fail to file an annual notification for an underground storage tank in accordance with such rules and regulations. The division shall issue confirmation of notification to the owner or operator for each facility with regulated underground storage tanks for which annual underground storage tank notifications have been submitted.

Beginning 180 days after rules and regulations are promulgated by the board establishing the requirements for annual tank notification and confirmation of notification as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, it shall be a violation of this Code section for any person to place or cause to be placed regulated substances in an underground storage tank for which the tank owner or operator has failed to provide the annual tank notification to the division as required in this subsection.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 8.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-14. Corrective action for violations of chapter, rules and regulations, or orders and for release of regulated substance into environment.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation of the board, or any order of the director has occurred, he shall attempt to remedy the same by conference, conciliation, or persuasion. In case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to correct or remedy any violation, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators. The order shall specify the provisions of the chapter or rules or regulations or order alleged to have been violated and may order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order. An order issued by the director under this Code section shall be signed by the director. Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing pursuant to Code Section 12-13-16.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that there is or has been a release of a regulated substance into the environment from an underground tank, regardless of the time at which storage of such material occurred, and has reason to believe that such release poses a danger to health or the environment, the director shall attempt to obtain corrective action for such release by conference, conciliation, or persuasion. In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to obtain corrective action, the director may issue an order directed to any person, including any current owner or operator or any past owner or operator who has contributed to such release. The order may direct that necessary corrective action may be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 9.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-15. Injunctions and restraining orders.

Whenever, in the judgment of the director, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or would constitute a violation of this chapter, the rules and regulations, or any order or permit conditions, he may make application to the superior court of the county in which the violative act or practice has been or is about to be engaged in or in which the owner or operator resides for an order enjoining such act or practice or for an order requiring compliance with this chapter, the rules and regulations, or the order; and upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such violative act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing the lack of an adequate remedy at law.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)

12-13-16. Hearings and review.

All hearings on and review of contested matters and orders and all hearings on and review of any other enforcement actions or orders under this chapter shall be provided and conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2. The hearing and review procedure provided in such Code section is to the exclusion of all other means of hearing or review.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12.)

12-13-17. Judgment in accordance with division's order.

Any order of a hearing officer issued after a hearing as provided in Code Section 12-13-16 or any order of the director issued pursuant to Code Section 12-13-14, either unappealed from as provided in those Code sections or affirmed or modified on any review or appeal pursuant to Code Section 12-13-16, from which no further review is taken or allowed under Code Section 12-13-16 may be filed, as unappealed from or as affirmed or modified, if reviewed or appealed, by certified copy from the director in superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides or, if said person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business or in the county wherein the violation occurred. The superior court shall then render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be the same as though said judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)

12-13-18. Required compliance with chapter; proof that petroleum subjected to environmental fee; violations of chapter; access to property.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the storage of regulated substances in underground tanks except in such a manner so as to conform to and comply with any provisions of this chapter or any of the rules, regulations, and orders established under this chapter. The owner or operator of any underground storage tank for petroleum shall maintain proof that all petroleum stored in such tank after July 1, 1988, was subjected to the environmental fee imposed in subsection (a) of Code Section 12-13-10.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall be a violation of this chapter to:

Cause or permit the release of a regulated substance from an underground storage tank into the environment; or

Install an underground storage tank that does not meet the minimum standards pursuant to this chapter or the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Any real property owner adjoining a leaking underground storage tank site who refuses to allow either the owner or operator or the division, through its agents or contractors, access for purposes of providing corrective action for any pollution that may have migrated onto the adjoining real property from the leaking underground storage tank site shall be responsible for the remediation and cleanup of that pollution plume should it migrate off that real property onto the real property of another.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 10.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "July 1, 1988" was substituted for "the effective date of this chapter" in the second sentence of present subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "1988," was substituted for "1988" in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-19. Violations; imposition of penalties.

If a person fails to comply with an order under Code Section 12-13-14 within the time specified in the order, he shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than $25,000.00 for each day of continued noncompliance.

Any person who fails to notify or submits false information pursuant to any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 for each tank for which notification is not given or for each time false information is submitted.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any requirement, standard, rule, or regulation promulgated by the board pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 for each day of violation for each underground storage tank in violation thereof.

Any person not subject to the provisions of 18 U.S.C. Section 1905 who knowingly and willfully divulges or discloses any information entitled to protection under Code Section 12-13-21 shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than $5,000.00 or to imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation effective under this chapter or has failed or refused to comply with any final order or emergency order of the director, he may upon written request cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed by the board. Upon finding that said person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation effective under this chapter or has failed or refused to comply with any final order or emergency order of the director, said hearing officer shall issue his decision imposing civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Such hearing and any administrative or judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 12-13-16.

In rendering a decision under this Code section imposing civil penalties, the hearing officer shall consider all factors which are relevant including, but not limited to, the following:

The amount of civil penalty necessary to ensure immediate and continued compliance and the extent to which the violator may have profited by failing or delaying to comply;

The character and degree of impact of the violation or failure on the natural resources of the state, especially any rare or unique natural phenomena;

The conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty in promptly taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to comply or to correct the violation or failure;

Any prior violations or failures to comply by such person with statutes, rules, regulations, or orders administered, adopted, or issued by the director;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with public health or safety which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure; and

The character and degree of injury to or interference with reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure.

All civil penalties recovered by the director as provided in this Code section shall be paid into the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund established pursuant to the provisions of Code Section

12-13-9

.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, §§ 11, 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "Section" was inserted following "U.S.C." in subsection (d).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-20. Emergency orders; hearing.

Whenever the director finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health, safety, or well-being, the director may issue an order declaring the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken to meet the emergency as the director specifies. Such order shall be effective immediately.
Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately but on application to the director shall be afforded a hearing within 48 hours.
On the basis of such hearing, the director may continue such order in effect, revoke it, or modify it.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 13.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-21. Public access to records.

Any records, reports, or information obtained from any person pursuant to this chapter shall be available to the public, except that upon a showing satisfactory to the director by any person that such records, reports, or information or a particular part thereof to which the director or any officer, employee, or representative thereof has access pursuant to this chapter, if made public, would divulge information entitled to protection under 18 U.S.C. Section 1905, such information or particular portion thereof shall be considered confidential in accordance with the purposes of that statute. However, such confidential record, report, document, or information may be disclosed to other officers, employees, or authorized representatives of the State of Georgia or the United States concerned with carrying out this chapter or the federal act or, when relevant, in any proceedings under this chapter or the federal act.

In submitting information pursuant to this chapter, a person required to provide such information may:

Designate the information which such person believes is entitled to protection under this Code section; and

Submit such designated information separately from other data submitted under this Code section.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "Section" was inserted following "U.S.C." in subsection (a).

12-13-22. Representation by Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or his representative to represent the director in all actions in connection with this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)